Washington statutes.
RCW 19.150.903

Chapter not applicable to owner subject to Article 62A.7 RCW.

If an owner issues any warehouse receipt, bill of lading, or other document of title for the personal property stored, the owner and the occupant are subject to Article 62A.7 RCW (commencing with RCW 62A.7-101) of the uniform commercial code and this chapter does not apply.

[ 1988 c 240 s 18.]